src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The 18th century Southern Saami language nouns inflect in number and cases.

LEXICON Cases
 +N+Sg+Nom:0   #     ;

LEXICON nv
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N: nv_oblique ;


LEXICON nv_oblique
+Sg+Gen:%>n # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>b # ;
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>i # ;
+Sg+Ela:%>st # ;
+Sg+Ine:%>sn # ;
+Sg+Ine:%>n # ;
+Sg+Com:%>in # ;
+Sg+Abe:%>t # ;
+Sg+Abe:%>tak # ;
+Sg+Abe:%>taka # ;
+Sg+Ess:%>n # ;

+Pl+Nom:%>h # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>i # ;
+Pl+Acc:%>it # ;
+Pl+Ill:%>it # ;
+Pl+Ill:%>iti # ;
+Pl+Ela:%>ist # ;
+Pl+Ine:%>isne # ;
+Pl+Ine:%>in # ;
+Pl+Com:%>i # ;
+Pl+Ess:%>in # ;

LEXICON nc
+N: nc_cases ;

LEXICON nc_cases
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen:e%>n # ;
+Sg+Acc:e%>b # ;
+Sg+Ill:e%>i # ;
+Sg+Ela:e%>st # ;
+Sg+Ine:e%>sne # ;
+Sg+Ine:e%>n # ;
+Sg+Com:e%>in # ;
+Sg+Abe:a%>tta # ;
+Sg+Abe:e%>tta # ;
+Sg+Ess:e%>n # ;

+Pl+Nom:e%>h # ;
+Pl+Gen:e%>i # ;
+Pl+Acc:e%>it # ;
+Pl+Ill:e%>it # ;
+Pl+Ela:e%>ist # ;
+Pl+Ine:e%>isne # ;
+Pl+Ine:e%>in # ;
+Pl+Com:e%>i # ;
+Pl+Ess:e%>in # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
