src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the 18th century Southern Saami language refer to objects or sets of objects, qualities, states or ideas.

LEXICON Nouns
attje:attje nv "pater" ;
kabmak:kabmak nc "sko" ;
usto:usto nv "lust" ;
akka:akka nv " hustru" ;
almats:almatj nc ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
